ext/liblouis/tables/translation/_translation_da-g2.ctb
# letter n
word naturligvis 1345-2345-1236
always nda 1345-145-1
always ndende 1345-12346-1456
always ndend 1345-1456-12345
always ndene 1345-1456-1246
always nden 1345-12346
always ndere 1345-1456-12356
always nder 1345-23456
always ndete 1345-1456-1256
always ndet 1345-2346
always nde 1345-1456
always ndi 1345-145-24
always ndo =
always ndrend 1345-145-12356-12345
always ndrene 1345-145-12356-1246
always ndren 1345-145-1235-126
always ndrere 1345-145-12356-12356
always ndrer 1345-145-1235-156
always ndrete 1345-145-12356-1256
always ndret 1345-145-1235-346
always ndre 1345-145-12356
always ndr =
always ndu =
always ndy =
always ndæ 1345-145-345
always ndâ 1345-145-16
always ndâ 1345-145-345
always ndâ 1345-145-16
always ndæ 1345-145-345
always ndæ 1345-145-345
always ndö 1345-145-246
always ndø 1345-145-246
always nd 12345
word ned 1246
always nena 1246-1345-1
always nenda 1345-126-145-1
always nende 1345-126-1456
always nendi 1345-126-145-24
always nendo 1345-126-145-135
always nendu 1345-126-145-136
always nendy 1345-126-145-13456
always nendæ 1345-126-145-345
always nendâ 1345-126-145-16
always nendâ 1345-126-145-345
always nendâ 1345-126-145-16
always nendæ 1345-126-145-345
always nendæ 1345-126-145-345
always nendö 1345-126-145-246
always nendø 1345-126-145-246
always nend 1246-12345
always nene 1246-1246
always neni 1246-1345-24
always nenore 1246-1345-135-12356
always nenor 1246-1345-1346
always neno 1246-1345-136
always nenu 1246-1345-136
always neny 1246-1345-13456
always nenæ 1246-1345-345
always nenâ 1246-1345-16
always nenâ 1246-1345-345
always nenâ 1246-1345-16
always nenæ 1246-1345-345
always nenæ 1246-1345-345
always nenö 1246-1345-246
always nenø 1246-1345-246
always nen 1345-126
always nera 1246-1235-1
always nerend 1246-12356-12345
always nerene 1246-12356-1246
always neren 1246-1235-126
always nerere 1246-12356-12356
always nerer 1246-1235-156
always nerete 1246-12356-1256
always neret 1246-1235-346
always nere 1246-12356
always neri 1246-1235-24
always nerore 1246-1235-135-12356
always neror 1246-1235-1346
always nero 1246-1235-135
always neru 1246-1235-136
always nery 1246-1235-13456
always neræ 1246-1235-345
always nerâ 1246-1235-16
always nerâ 1246-1235-345
always nerâ 1246-1235-16
always neræ 1246-1235-345
always neræ 1246-1235-345
always nerö 1246-1235-246
always nerø 1246-1235-246
always ner 1345-156
always neta 1246-2345-1
always netend 1246-1256-12345
always netene 1246-1256-1246
always neten 1246-2345-126
always netere 1246-1256-12356
always neter 1246-2345-156
always netete 1246-1256-1256
always netet 1246-2345-346
always nete 1246-1256
always neti 1246-2345-24
always netop 1345-346-135-1234
always netore 1246-2345-135-12356
always netor 1246-2345-1346
always neto 1246-2345-135
always netu 1246-2345-136
always nety 1246-2345-13456
always netæ 1246-2345-345
always netâ 1246-2345-16
always netâ 1246-2345-345
always netâ 1246-2345-16
always netæ 1246-2345-345
always netæ 1246-2345-345
always netö 1246-2345-246
always netø 1246-2345-246
always net 1345-346
always ne 1246
word nogen 1345-1345
word noget 1345-2345
word nogle 1345-123-15
word nâr 1345
word nâr 1345

# letter o
word ogsâ 14-16
word ogsâ 14-16
word og 25
word omkring 135-134-13
word op 135
always ora =
always orend 135-12356-12345
always orenend 135-12356-1246-12345
always orenene 135-12356-1246-1246
always orenen 135-12356-1345-126
always orenere 135-12356-1246-12356
always orener 135-12356-1345-156
always orenete 135-12356-1246-1256
always orenet 135-12356-1345-346
always orene 135-12356-1246
always oren 135-1235-126
always orere 135-12356-12356
always orer 135-1235-156
always oreta 135-12356-2345-1
always orete 135-12356-1256
always oreti 135-12356-2345-24
always oreto 135-12356-2345-135
always oretu 135-12356-2345-136
always oret 135-1235-346
always ore 135-12356
always ori =
always oror 135-1235-1346
always oro =
always oru =
always ory =
always oræ 135-1235-345
always orâ 135-1235-16
always orâ 135-1235-345
always orâ 135-1235-16
always oræ 135-1235-345
always oræ 135-1235-345
always orö 135-1235-246
always orø 135-1235-246
always or 1346
always over- 135-1236-156-36
word over 1346
begword over 135-1236-156

# letter p
always pristager 1234-1235-24-234-2345-1-1245-156
always pristage 1234-1235-24-234-2345-1-12456
always pristag =
word pâ 1234
word pâ 1234

# letter r
always rena 12356-1345-1
always renda 1235-126-145-1
always renden 1235-126-12346
always render 1235-126-23456
always rendet 1235-126-2346
always rende 1235-126-1456
always rendi 1235-126-145-24
always rendore 1235-126-145-135-12356
always rendor 1235-126-145-1346
always rendo 1235-126-145-135
always rendu 1235-126-145-136
always rendy 1235-126-145-13456
always rendæ 1235-126-145-345
always rendâ 1235-126-145-16
always rendâ 1235-126-145-345
always rendâ 1235-126-145-16
always rendæ 1235-126-145-345
always rendæ 1235-126-145-345
always rendö 1235-126-145-246
always rendø 1235-126-145-246
always rend 12356-12345
always renend 12356-1246-12345
always renene 12356-1246-1246
always renen 12356-1345-126
always renere 12356-1246-12356
always rener 12356-1345-156
always renete 12356-1246-1256
always renet 12356-1345-346
always rene 12356-1246
always reni 12356-1345-24
always renore 12356-1345-135-12356
always renor 12356-1345-1346
always reno 12356-1345-135
always renu 12356-1345-136
always reny 12356-1345-13456
always renæ 12356-1345-345
always renâ 12356-1345-16
always renâ 12356-1345-345
always renâ 12356-1345-16
always renæ 12356-1345-345
always renæ 12356-1345-345
always renö 12356-1345-246
always renø 12356-1345-246
always ren 1235-126
always rera 12356-1235-1
always rerend 1235-12356-12345
always rerene 12356-12356-1246
always reren 12356-1235-126
always rerere 12356-12356-12356
always rerer 12356-1235-156
always rerete 12356-12356-1256
always reret 12356-1235-346
always rere 12356-12356
always reri 12356-1235-24
always rerore 12356-1235-135-12356
always reror 12356-1235-1346
always rero 12356-1235-135
always reru 12356-1235-136
always rery 12356-1235-13456
always reræ 12356-1235-345
always rerâ 12356-1235-16
always rerâ 12356-1235-345
always rerâ 12356-1235-16
always reræ 12356-1235-345
always reræ 12356-1235-345
always rerö 12356-1235-246
always rerø 12356-1235-246
always rer 1235-156
always ret- 1235-346-36
always reta 12356-2345-1
always retend 12356-1256-12345
always retene 12356-1256-1246
always reten 12356-2345-126
always retere 12356-1256-12356
always reter 12356-2345-156
always retete 12356-1256-1256
always retet 12356-2345-346
always rete 12356-1256
always reti 12356-2345-24
always retore 12356-2345-135-12356
always retor 12356-2345-1346
always reto 12356-2345-135
always retu 12356-2345-136
always rety 12356-2345-13456
always retæ 12356-2345-345
always retâ 12356-2345-16
always retâ 12356-2345-345
always retâ 12356-2345-16
always retæ 12356-2345-345
always retæ 12356-2345-345
always retö 12356-2345-246
always retø 12356-2345-246
word ret 12356
always ret 1235-346
always re 12356
word rigtige 1235-12456
word rigtigt 1235-2345
word rigtig 1235

# letter s
word sagde 234-1456
word sammen 234-134
word samme 234-146
word selvfölgelig 234-1236-124
word selvfølgelig 234-1236-124
word selv 234-1236
word sidste 234-1356-15
word sidst 234-1356
word sin 234-1345
word sit 234-2345
word skal 123456
word skulle 123456-123-15
always sk 123456
word snart 234-1235
word som 234
always st. 234-2345-345
always st 1356
word sâdan 16-1
word sâledes 16-15
word sâ 16
word sâdan 16-1
word sâledes 16-15
word sâ 16

# letter t
always tena 1256-1345-1
always tenda 2345-126-145-1
always tenden 2345-126-12346
always tender 2345-126-23456
always tendet 2345-126-2346
always tende 2345-126-1456
always tendig 2345-126-145-35
always tendi 2345-126-145-24
always tendore 2345-126-145-135-12356
always tendor 2345-126-145-1346
always tendo 2345-126-145-135
always tendu 2345-126-145-136
always tendy 2345-126-145-13456
always tendæ 2345-126-145-345
always tendâ 2345-126-145-16
always tendâ 2345-126-145-345
always tendâ 2345-126-145-16
always tendæ 2345-126-145-345
always tendæ 2345-126-145-345
always tendö 2345-126-145-246
always tendø 2345-126-145-246
always tenend 1256-1246-12345
always tenene 1256-1246-1246
always tenen 1256-1345-126
always tenere 1256-1246-12356
always tener 1256-1345-156
always tenete 1256-1246-1256
always tenet 1256-1345-346
always tene 1256-1246
always teni 1256-1345-24
always tenore 1256-1345-135-12356
always tenor 1256-1345-1346
always teno 1256-1345-135
always tenu 1256-1345-136
always teny 1256-1345-13456
always tenæ 1256-1345-345
always tenâ 1256-1345-16
always tenâ 1256-1345-345
always tenâ 1256-1345-16
always tenæ 1256-1345-345
always tenæ 1256-1345-345
always tenö 1256-1345-246
always tenø 1256-1345-246
always ten 2345-126
always tera 1256-1235-1
always terend 1256-12356-12345
always terene 1256-12356-1246
always teren 1256-1235-126
always terere 1256-12356-12356
always terer 1256-1235-156
always terete 1256-12356-1256
always teret 1256-1235-346
always tere 1256-12356
always terige 1256-1235-24-12456
always terig 1256-1235-35
always teri 1256-1235-24
always terore 1256-1235-135-12356
always teror 1256-1235-1346
always tero 1256-1235-135
always teru 1256-1235-136
always tery 1256-1235-13456
always teræ 1256-1235-345
always terâ 1256-1235-16
always terâ 1256-1235-345
always terâ 1256-1235-16
always teræ 1256-1235-345
always teræ 1256-1235-345
always terö 1256-1235-246
always terø 1256-1235-246
always ter 2345-156
always teta 1256-2345-1
always tetend 1256-1256-12345
always tetene 1256-1256-1246
always teten 1256-2345-126
always tetere 1256-1256-12356
always teter 1256-2345-156
always tetete 1256-1256-1256
always tetet 1256-2345-346
always tete 1256-1256
always tetige 1256-2345-24-12456
always tetig 1256-2345-35
always teti 1256-2345-24
always tetore 1256-2345-135-12356
always tetor 1256-2345-1346
always teto 1256-2345-135
always tetu 1256-2345-136
always tety 1256-2345-13456
always tetæ 1256-2345-345
always tetâ 1256-2345-16
always tetâ 1256-2345-345
always tetâ 1256-2345-16
always tetæ 1256-2345-345
always tetæ 1256-2345-345
always tetö 1256-2345-246
always tetø 1256-2345-246
always tet 2345-346
always te 1256
word tid 2345-145
word tilbage 2345-12
word til 2345

# letter u
word under 12345
